Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to  the Oregon Youth Authority, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2019, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Operations.............................  $ 294,012,431
(2) Juvenile crime
prevention/diversion..............  $ 19,212,845
(3) Multnomah County
gang services ........................  $ 3,688,005
(4) East Metro Gang
Enforcement Team ............... $ 2,004,334
(5) Debt service .......................... $ 15,026,340
(6) Capital improvements ........... $ 1,594,075
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$7,316,478 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Oregon Youth
Authority.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$40,717,232 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon Youth  Author-
ity.
SECTION 4. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5541 (SB 5541-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate May 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 6, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5541 (SB 5541-A) Page 2